Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.230

Purchases from entities serving or providing opportunities through community rehabilitation programs.

The state agencies and departments are hereby authorized to purchase products and/or services manufactured or provided by community rehabilitation programs of the department of social and health services.

Such purchases shall be at the fair market price of such products and services as determined by the department of enterprise services. To determine the fair market price the department shall use the last comparable bid on the products and/or services or in the alternative the last price paid for the products and/or services. The increased cost of labor, materials, and other documented costs since the last comparable bid or the last price paid are additional cost factors which shall be considered in determining fair market price. Upon the establishment of the fair market price as provided for in this section the department is hereby empowered to negotiate directly for the purchase of products or services with officials in charge of the community rehabilitation programs of the department of social and health services.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 226; 2005 c 204 s 2; 2003 c 136 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 10 s 2; 1974 ex.s. c 40 s 3. Formerly RCW 43.19.530.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.